Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.655

Commission—Supervision of records—Rules.

The commission shall:

(1) Require licensed dentists to keep and maintain a copy of each laboratory referral instruction, describing detailed services rendered, for a period to be determined by the commission but not more than three years, and may require the production of all such records for examination by the commission or its authorized representatives; and

(2) Adopt reasonable rules requiring licensed dentists to make, maintain, and produce for examination by the commission or its authorized representatives such other records as may be reasonable and proper in the performance of its duties and enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 222; 1986 c 259 s 35; 1953 c 93 s 8. Formerly RCW 18.32.085.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.